Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.025

Improvement of statutes.

The committee, or the reviser with the approval of the committee, shall from time to time make written recommendations to the legislature concerning deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions in, and need for reorganization or revision of, the statutes, and shall prepare for submission to the legislature, legislation for the correction or removal of such deficiencies, conflicts or obsolete provisions, or to otherwise improve the form or substance of any portion of the statute law of this state as the public interest or the administration of the subject may require.

Such or similar projects may also be undertaken at the request of the legislature and legislative interim bodies and if such undertaking will not impede the other functions of the committee.

All such proposed legislation shall be annotated so as to show the purposes, reasons, and history thereof.

[ 1997 c 41 s 1; 1983 c 52 s 2; 1959 c 95 s 3; 1951 c 157 s 11.]